dictionaries/sk_SK-ascii.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY aoeintsvrlkmdpuhjzácbyčžíšýúťéľôďgfňäóŕxĺwěřqůAOEINTSVRLKMDPUHJZÁCBYČŽÍŠÝÚŤÉĽÔĎGFŇÄÓŔXĹWĚŘQŮ
REP 52
REP a á
REP á a
REP í i
REP i í
REP ó o
REP o ó
REP o ô
REP ú u
REP u ú
REP u ű
REP ű ü
REP ü ű
REP y z
REP z y
REP 2 ľ
REP 3 š
REP 4 č
REP 5 ť
REP 6 ž
REP 7 ý
REP 8 á
REP 9 í
REP 0 é
REP a ä
REP e ä
REP ä e
REP y ý
REP ý y
REP ý í
REP í ý
REP c č
REP č c
REP p b
REP b p
REP s z
REP z s
REP d ď
REP ď d
REP z ž
REP ž z
REP n ň
REP ň n
REP s š
REP š s
REP e é
REP é e
REP l ľ
REP l ĺ
REP ľ l
REP ĺ l
REP ĺ ľ
REP ľ ĺ
FLAG num
LANG sk_SK
SFX 1 N 1
SFX 1 ec ca .
SFX 2 N 1
SFX 2 ec covi .
SFX 3 N 1
SFX 3 ec com .
SFX 4 N 1
SFX 4 ec ci .
SFX 5 N 1
SFX 5 ec cov .
SFX 6 N 1
SFX 6 ec coch .
SFX 7 N 1
SFX 7 ec cami .
SFX 8 N 1
SFX 8 a y .
SFX 9 N 1
SFX 9 a e .
SFX 10 N 1
SFX 10 a u .
SFX 11 N 1
SFX 11 a ou .
SFX 12 N 1
SFX 12 ka ok .
SFX 13 N 1
SFX 13 0 m .
SFX 14 N 1
SFX 14 0 ch .
SFX 15 N 1
SFX 15 0 mi .
SFX 16 N 1
SFX 16 o a .
SFX 17 N 1
SFX 17 o u .
SFX 18 N 1
SFX 18 a i .
SFX 19 N 1
SFX 19 0 a .
SFX 20 N 1
SFX 20 0 ovi .
SFX 21 N 1
SFX 21 0 om .
SFX 22 N 1
SFX 22 0 ia .
SFX 23 N 1
SFX 23 0 ov .
SFX 24 N 1
SFX 24 0 och .
SFX 25 N 1
SFX 25 ka iek .
SFX 26 N 1
SFX 26 0 u .
SFX 27 N 1
SFX 27 0 e .
SFX 28 N 1
SFX 28 0 ovia .
SFX 29 N 1
SFX 29 0 ami .
SFX 30 N 1
SFX 30 0 ych .
SFX 31 N 1
SFX 31 0 ym .
SFX 32 N 1
SFX 32 0 ymi .
SFX 33 N 1
SFX 33 0 ej .
SFX 34 N 1
SFX 34 0 ou .
SFX 35 N 1
SFX 35 0 ho .
SFX 36 N 1
SFX 36 0 mu .
SFX 37 N 1
SFX 37 0 i .
SFX 38 N 1
SFX 38 0 o .
SFX 39 N 1
SFX 39 i ov .
SFX 40 N 1
SFX 40 i om .
SFX 41 N 1
SFX 41 i och .
SFX 42 N 1
SFX 42 i ami .
SFX 43 N 1
SFX 43 es a .
SFX 44 N 1
SFX 44 es ovi .
SFX 45 N 1
SFX 45 es om .
SFX 46 N 1
SFX 46 es ovia .
SFX 47 N 1
SFX 47 es ov .
SFX 48 N 1
SFX 48 es och .
SFX 49 N 1
SFX 49 es mi .
SFX 50 N 1
SFX 50 a 0 .
SFX 51 N 1
SFX 51 0 vi .
SFX 52 N 1
SFX 52 0 via .
SFX 53 N 1
SFX 53 0 v .
SFX 54 N 1
SFX 54 o ami .
SFX 55 N 1
SFX 55 ela iel .
SFX 56 N 1
SFX 56 a iam .
SFX 57 N 1
SFX 57 a iach .
SFX 58 N 1
SFX 58 o mi .
SFX 59 N 1
SFX 59 ena ien .
SFX 60 N 1
SFX 60 er ra .
SFX 61 N 1
SFX 61 er rovi .
SFX 62 N 1
SFX 62 er rom .
SFX 63 N 1
SFX 63 er rovia .
SFX 64 N 1
SFX 64 er rov .
SFX 65 N 1
SFX 65 er roch .
SFX 66 N 1
SFX 66 er rami .
SFX 67 N 1
SFX 67 ra ier .
SFX 68 N 1
SFX 68 eta iet .
SFX 69 N 1
SFX 69 na ien .
SFX 70 N 1
SFX 70 um a .
SFX 71 N 1
SFX 71 m 0 .
SFX 72 N 1
SFX 72 um e .
SFX 73 N 1
SFX 73 um om .
SFX 74 N 1
SFX 74 y 0 .
SFX 75 N 1
SFX 75 y am .
SFX 76 N 1
SFX 76 y ach .
SFX 77 N 1
SFX 77 y ami .
SFX 78 N 1
SFX 78 ok ka .
SFX 79 N 1
SFX 79 ok kovi .
SFX 80 N 1
SFX 80 ok ku .
SFX 81 N 1
SFX 81 ok kom .
SFX 82 N 1
SFX 82 a ej .
SFX 83 N 1
SFX 83 h ze .
SFX 84 N 1
SFX 84 e a .
SFX 85 N 1
SFX 85 e u .
SFX 86 N 1
SFX 86 e 0 .
SFX 87 N 1
SFX 87 e m .
SFX 88 N 1
SFX 88 e am .
SFX 89 N 1
SFX 89 e ach .
SFX 90 N 1
SFX 90 e ami .
SFX 91 N 1
SFX 91 e iam .
SFX 92 N 1
SFX 92 e iach .
SFX 93 N 1
SFX 93 k ci .
SFX 94 N 1
SFX 94 any ian .
SFX 95 N 1
SFX 95 y om .
SFX 96 N 1
SFX 96 y och .
SFX 97 N 1
SFX 97 y mi .
SFX 98 N 1
SFX 98 o e .
SFX 99 N 1
SFX 99 e om .
SFX 100 N 1
SFX 100 e ym .
SFX 101 N 1
SFX 101 0 y .
SFX 102 N 1
SFX 102 ec cu .
SFX 103 N 1
SFX 103 s 0 .
SFX 104 N 1
SFX 104 us e .
SFX 105 N 1
SFX 105 us om .
SFX 106 N 1
SFX 106 es ami .
SFX 107 N 1
SFX 107 y ov .
SFX 108 N 1
SFX 108 a ovi .
SFX 109 N 1
SFX 109 a om .
SFX 110 N 1
SFX 110 era ier .
SFX 111 N 1
SFX 111 ek ka .
SFX 112 N 1
SFX 112 ek kovi .
SFX 113 N 1
SFX 113 ek kom .
SFX 114 N 1
SFX 114 ek kovia .
SFX 115 N 1
SFX 115 ek kov .
SFX 116 N 1
SFX 116 ek koch .
SFX 117 N 1
SFX 117 ek kami .
SFX 118 N 1
SFX 118 a ovia .
SFX 119 N 1
SFX 119 a ov .
SFX 120 N 1
SFX 120 a och .
SFX 121 N 1
SFX 121 e ovi .
SFX 122 N 1
SFX 122 e ovia .
SFX 123 N 1
SFX 123 e ov .
SFX 124 N 1
SFX 124 e och .
SFX 125 N 1
SFX 125 e mi .
SFX 126 N 1
SFX 126 i 0 .
SFX 127 N 1
SFX 127 i am .
SFX 128 N 1
SFX 128 i ach .
SFX 129 N 1
SFX 129 el la .
SFX 130 N 1
SFX 130 el lu .
SFX 131 N 1
SFX 131 el li .
SFX 132 N 1
SFX 132 el lom .
SFX 133 N 1
SFX 133 ma iem .
SFX 134 N 1
SFX 134 us a .
SFX 135 N 1
SFX 135 us ovi .
SFX 136 N 1
SFX 136 us ovia .
SFX 137 N 1
SFX 137 us ov .
SFX 138 N 1
SFX 138 us och .
SFX 139 N 1
SFX 139 us ami .
SFX 140 N 1
SFX 140 ce iec .
SFX 141 N 1
SFX 141 ery ier .
SFX 142 N 1
SFX 142 e i .
SFX 143 N 1
SFX 143 ec ce .
SFX 144 N 1
SFX 144 ga ieg .
SFX 145 N 1
SFX 145 el lovi .
SFX 146 N 1
SFX 146 el lovia .
SFX 147 N 1
SFX 147 el lov .
SFX 148 N 1
SFX 148 el loch .
SFX 149 N 1
SFX 149 el lami .
SFX 150 N 1
SFX 150 ol la .
SFX 151 N 1
SFX 151 ol lovi .
SFX 152 N 1
SFX 152 ol lom .
SFX 153 N 1
SFX 153 ol lovia .
SFX 154 N 1
SFX 154 ol lov .
SFX 155 N 1
SFX 155 ol loch .
SFX 156 N 1
SFX 156 ol lami .
SFX 157 N 1
SFX 157 la iel .
SFX 158 N 1
SFX 158 en ne .
SFX 159 N 1
SFX 159 en ni .
SFX 160 N 1
SFX 160 en nou .
SFX 161 N 1
SFX 161 os a .
SFX 162 N 1
SFX 162 s vi .
SFX 163 N 1
SFX 163 s m .
SFX 164 N 1
SFX 164 s via .
SFX 165 N 1
SFX 165 s v .
SFX 166 N 1
SFX 166 s ch .
SFX 167 N 1
SFX 167 os ami .
SFX 168 N 1
SFX 168 as ovi .
SFX 169 N 1
SFX 169 as om .
SFX 170 N 1
SFX 170 er ru .
SFX 171 N 1
SFX 171 er ri .
SFX 172 N 1
SFX 172 us mi .
SFX 173 N 1
SFX 173 iec ca .
SFX 174 N 1
SFX 174 iec cu .
SFX 175 N 1
SFX 175 iec ci .
SFX 176 N 1
SFX 176 iec com .
SFX 177 N 1
SFX 177 y eho .
SFX 178 N 1
SFX 178 y emu .
SFX 179 N 1
SFX 179 ec covia .
SFX 180 N 1
SFX 180 le el .
SFX 181 N 1
SFX 181 i eho .
SFX 182 N 1
SFX 182 i emu .
SFX 183 N 1
SFX 183 Zeus Dia .
SFX 184 N 1
SFX 184 Zeus Diovi .
SFX 185 N 1
SFX 185 Zeus Diom .
SFX 186 N 1
SFX 186 y i .
SFX 187 N 1
SFX 187 y e .
SFX 188 N 1
SFX 188 y a .
SFX 189 N 1
SFX 189 y ej .
SFX 190 N 1
SFX 190 y u .
SFX 191 N 1
SFX 191 y ou .
SFX 192 N 1
SFX 192 ovat ujem .
SFX 193 N 1
SFX 193 ovat ujes .
SFX 194 N 1
SFX 194 ovat uje .
SFX 195 N 1
SFX 195 ovat ujeme .
SFX 196 N 1
SFX 196 ovat ujete .
SFX 197 N 1
SFX 197 ovat uju .
SFX 198 N 1
SFX 198 ovat uj .
SFX 199 N 1
SFX 199 ovat ujme .
SFX 200 N 1
SFX 200 ovat ujte .
SFX 201 N 1
SFX 201 ovat ujuc .
SFX 202 N 1
SFX 202 t l .
SFX 203 N 1
SFX 203 t la .
SFX 204 N 1
SFX 204 t lo .
SFX 205 N 1
SFX 205 t li .
SFX 206 N 1
SFX 206 eda ied .
SFX 207 N 1
SFX 207 y ejsi .
SFX 208 N 1
SFX 208 y ejsieho .
SFX 209 N 1
SFX 209 y ejsiemu .
SFX 210 N 1
SFX 210 y ejsom .
SFX 211 N 1
SFX 211 y ejsim .
SFX 212 N 1
SFX 212 y ejsich .
SFX 213 N 1
SFX 213 y ejsimi .
SFX 214 N 1
SFX 214 y ejsie .
SFX 215 N 1
SFX 215 y ejsia .
SFX 216 N 1
SFX 216 y ejsej .
SFX 217 N 1
SFX 217 y ejsiu .
SFX 218 N 1
SFX 218 y ejsou .
SFX 219 Y 1
SFX 219 y ejsi .
PFX 219 Y 1
PFX 219 0 naj .
SFX 220 Y 1
SFX 220 y ejsieho .
PFX 220 Y 1
PFX 220 0 naj .
SFX 221 Y 1
SFX 221 y ejsiemu .
PFX 221 Y 1
PFX 221 0 naj .
SFX 222 Y 1
SFX 222 y ejsom .
PFX 222 Y 1
PFX 222 0 naj .
SFX 223 Y 1
SFX 223 y ejsim .
PFX 223 Y 1
PFX 223 0 naj .
SFX 224 Y 1
SFX 224 y ejsich .
PFX 224 Y 1
PFX 224 0 naj .
SFX 225 Y 1
SFX 225 y ejsimi .
PFX 225 Y 1
PFX 225 0 naj .
SFX 226 Y 1
SFX 226 y ejsie .
PFX 226 Y 1
PFX 226 0 naj .
SFX 227 Y 1
SFX 227 y ejsia .
PFX 227 Y 1
PFX 227 0 naj .
SFX 228 Y 1
SFX 228 y ejsej .
PFX 228 Y 1
PFX 228 0 naj .
SFX 229 Y 1
SFX 229 y ejsiu .
PFX 229 Y 1
PFX 229 0 naj .
SFX 230 Y 1
SFX 230 y ejsou .
PFX 230 Y 1
PFX 230 0 naj .
SFX 231 N 1
SFX 231 0 jsie .
SFX 232 Y 1
SFX 232 0 jsie .
PFX 232 Y 1
PFX 232 0 naj .
SFX 233 N 1
SFX 233 0 iam .
SFX 234 N 1
SFX 234 0 iach .
SFX 235 N 1
SFX 235 us y .
SFX 236 N 1
SFX 236 um 0 .
SFX 237 N 1
SFX 237 um am .
SFX 238 N 1
SFX 238 um ach .
SFX 239 N 1
SFX 239 um ami .
SFX 240 N 1
SFX 240 vo iev .
SFX 241 N 1
SFX 241 o am .
SFX 242 N 1
SFX 242 o ach .
SFX 243 N 1
SFX 243 um i .
SFX 244 N 1
SFX 244 no ien .
SFX 245 N 1
SFX 245 t m .
SFX 246 N 1
SFX 246 t s .
SFX 247 N 1
SFX 247 t 0 .
SFX 248 N 1
SFX 248 t me .
SFX 249 N 1
SFX 249 t ju .
SFX 250 N 1
SFX 250 t j .
SFX 251 N 1
SFX 251 t jme .
SFX 252 N 1
SFX 252 t jte .
SFX 253 N 1
SFX 253 t juc .
SFX 254 N 1
SFX 254 o i .
SFX 255 N 1
SFX 255 a mi .
SFX 256 N 1
SFX 256 0 am .
SFX 257 N 1
SFX 257 0 ach .
SFX 258 N 1
SFX 258 us i .
SFX 259 N 1
SFX 259 esa ies .
SFX 260 N 1
SFX 260 0 eho .
SFX 261 N 1
SFX 261 0 emu .
SFX 262 N 1
SFX 262 i ej .
SFX 263 N 1
SFX 263 i ou .
SFX 264 N 1
SFX 264 ut em .
SFX 265 N 1
SFX 265 ut es .
SFX 266 N 1
SFX 266 ut e .
SFX 267 N 1
SFX 267 ut eme .
SFX 268 N 1
SFX 268 ut ete .
SFX 269 N 1
SFX 269 ut i .
SFX 270 N 1
SFX 270 ut ime .
SFX 271 N 1
SFX 271 ut ite .
SFX 272 N 1
SFX 272 t c .
SFX 273 N 1
SFX 273 nut ol .
SFX 274 N 1
SFX 274 nut la .
SFX 275 N 1
SFX 275 nut lo .
SFX 276 N 1
SFX 276 nut li .
SFX 277 N 1
SFX 277 e ia .
SFX 278 N 1
SFX 278 e ii .
SFX 279 N 1
SFX 279 e iami .
SFX 280 N 1
SFX 280 ro ier .
SFX 281 N 1
SFX 281 o 0 .
SFX 282 N 1
SFX 282 ento ient .
SFX 283 N 1
SFX 283 ok ky .
SFX 284 N 1
SFX 284 ok kov .
SFX 285 N 1
SFX 285 ok koch .
SFX 286 N 1
SFX 286 ok kami .
SFX 287 N 1
SFX 287 on a .
SFX 288 N 1
SFX 288 on u .
SFX 289 N 1
SFX 289 on e .
SFX 290 N 1
SFX 290 n m .
SFX 291 N 1
SFX 291 on 0 .
SFX 292 N 1
SFX 292 on am .
SFX 293 N 1
SFX 293 on ach .
SFX 294 N 1
SFX 294 on ami .
SFX 295 N 1
SFX 295 el le .
SFX 296 N 1
SFX 296 el ly .
SFX 297 N 1
SFX 297 er re .
SFX 298 N 1
SFX 298 ek ku .
SFX 299 N 1
SFX 299 ek ky .
PFX 300 N 1
PFX 300 aky ake .
PFX 301 N 1
PFX 301 aky akych .
PFX 302 N 1
PFX 302 aky akym .
PFX 303 N 1
PFX 303 aky akymi .
PFX 304 N 1
PFX 304 aky aka .
PFX 305 N 1
PFX 305 aky akej .
PFX 306 N 1
PFX 306 aky aku .
PFX 307 N 1
PFX 307 aky akou .
PFX 308 N 1
PFX 308 aky akeho .
PFX 309 N 1
PFX 309 aky akemu .
PFX 310 N 1
PFX 310 aky akom .
PFX 311 N 1
PFX 311 aky aki .
SFX 312 N 1
SFX 312 ysi esi .
SFX 313 N 1
SFX 313 si chsi .
SFX 314 N 1
SFX 314 si msi .
SFX 315 N 1
SFX 315 si misi .
SFX 316 N 1
SFX 316 ysi asi .
SFX 317 N 1
SFX 317 ysi ejsi .
SFX 318 N 1
SFX 318 ysi usi .
SFX 319 N 1
SFX 319 ysi ousi .
SFX 320 N 1
SFX 320 ysi ehosi .
SFX 321 N 1
SFX 321 ysi emusi .
SFX 322 N 1
SFX 322 ysi omsi .
SFX 323 N 1
SFX 323 ysi isi .
SFX 324 N 1
SFX 324 yze ehoze .
SFX 325 N 1
SFX 325 yze emuze .
SFX 326 N 1
SFX 326 yze omze .
SFX 327 N 1
SFX 327 ze mze .
SFX 328 N 1
SFX 328 yze ize .
SFX 329 N 1
SFX 329 ze chze .
SFX 330 N 1
SFX 330 ze mize .
SFX 331 N 1
SFX 331 yze eze .
SFX 332 N 1
SFX 332 yze aze .
SFX 333 N 1
SFX 333 yze ejze .
SFX 334 N 1
SFX 334 yze uze .
SFX 335 N 1
SFX 335 yze ouze .
SFX 336 N 1
SFX 336 i e .
SFX 337 N 1
SFX 337 i a .
SFX 338 N 1
SFX 338 i u .
SFX 339 N 1
SFX 339 na iek .
SFX 340 N 1
SFX 340 eto iet .
SFX 341 N 1
SFX 341 etto iett .
SFX 342 N 1
SFX 342 or ru .
SFX 343 N 1
SFX 343 or re .
SFX 344 N 1
SFX 344 or rom .
SFX 345 N 1
SFX 345 or ry .
SFX 346 N 1
SFX 346 or rov .
SFX 347 N 1
SFX 347 or roch .
SFX 348 N 1
SFX 348 or rami .
SFX 349 N 1
SFX 349 lo iel .
SFX 350 N 1
SFX 350 ba ieb .
SFX 351 N 1
SFX 351 o uovi .
SFX 352 N 1
SFX 352 os u .
SFX 353 N 1
SFX 353 os y .
SFX 354 N 1
SFX 354 os mi .
SFX 355 N 1
SFX 355 0 ta .
SFX 356 N 1
SFX 356 0 tu .
SFX 357 N 1
SFX 357 0 ti .
SFX 358 N 1
SFX 358 0 tom .
SFX 359 N 1
SFX 359 0 t .
SFX 360 N 1
SFX 360 0 tam .
SFX 361 N 1
SFX 361 0 tach .
SFX 362 N 1
SFX 362 0 tami .
SFX 363 N 1
SFX 363 or ra .
SFX 364 N 1
SFX 364 or rovi .
SFX 365 N 1
SFX 365 or ri .
SFX 366 N 1
SFX 366 eka iek .
SFX 367 N 1
SFX 367 mpa p .
SFX 368 N 1
SFX 368 esta iest .
SFX 369 N 1
SFX 369 ta iet .
SFX 370 N 1
SFX 370 eby ieb .
SFX 371 N 1
SFX 371 en nam .
SFX 372 N 1
SFX 372 en nach .
SFX 373 N 1
SFX 373 en nami .
SFX 374 N 1
SFX 374 en na .
SFX 375 N 1
SFX 375 en nu .
SFX 376 N 1
SFX 376 en nom .
SFX 377 N 1
SFX 377 en nov .
SFX 378 N 1
SFX 378 en noch .
SFX 379 N 1
SFX 379 ko ok .
SFX 380 N 1
SFX 380 o ejsie .
SFX 381 Y 1
SFX 381 o ejsie .
PFX 381 Y 1
PFX 381 0 naj .
SFX 382 N 1
SFX 382 at em .
SFX 383 N 1
SFX 383 at es .
SFX 384 N 1
SFX 384 at e .
SFX 385 N 1
SFX 385 at eme .
SFX 386 N 1
SFX 386 at ete .
SFX 387 N 1
SFX 387 at u .
SFX 388 N 1
SFX 388 at i .
SFX 389 N 1
SFX 389 at ime .
SFX 390 N 1
SFX 390 at ite .
SFX 391 N 1
SFX 391 at uc .
SFX 392 N 1
SFX 392 t a .
SFX 393 N 1
SFX 393 it 0 .
SFX 394 N 1
SFX 394 it me .
